District of Columbia statutes.
42-202.01

Rights of the holder of a conservation easement.

Whenever a recorded conservation easement has been registered with the Mayor, written consent of the holder of the registered and recorded conservation easement shall be required prior to the recordation of a subdivision by the Office of the Surveyor, and to the issuance of a permit for construction, demolition, alteration, or repair, except solely for interior work. With respect to the affected property, a conservation easement shall be deemed registered with the Mayor 10 days after proof of a recorded conservation easement is presented to the Historic Preservation Division of the Building and Land Regulation Administration, Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

History

May 16, 1986, D.C. Law 6-113, § 3a
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-233, § 2, 40 DCR 603

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2602.1.